Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB856.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 67ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLINGSec.6701. Scope of chapter.6702. Definitions.6703. Eco-fees and responsibilities.6704. Clearinghouse.6705. Stewardship plan.12345678910111213141516171819 6706. Collection convenience standard compliance.6707. Eco-fee.6708. CED manufacturer requirements.6709. Group plan requirements.6710. Convenience standards for program collection sites.6711. CED manufacturer recycling share responsibility.6712. Individual manufacturer and group plans.6713. Review of stewardship plan.6714. Fees for collection or recycling of eligible devices.6715. Recycler responsibilities.6716. Collector responsibilities.6717. Annual reports.6718. Advisory committee . 6719. Administrative reimbursement.6720. Environmental sound management requirements.6721. Disposal ban.6722. Enforcement.6723. Antitrust.6724. Other CED collection activities.§ 6701. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to electronic waste recycling.§ 6702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory committee." The Advisory Committee on Electronic Waste Recycling established under section 6718 (relating to advisory committee)."Assessment period." As follows:(1) A period of three calendar months starting on the 20250SB0856PN0957 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 day immediately following the last day of the prior assessment period.(2) The first assessment period shall start on the first day of the first program year."Best management practices." As follows:(1) Collecting and preparing items for shipment and recycling.(2) The term may include standards for packaging for transport, load size, acceptable load contamination levels, non-CED items included in a load and other standards."CED manufacturer." As follows:(1) A person or a successor in interest to a person, under whose brand or label a CED is sold at retail.(2) For a CED sold at retail under a brand or label that is licensed from a person who is a brand owner and who does not sell or produce a CED, the person who produced the CED or the person's successor in interest shall be the CED manufacturer.(3) For a television or computer monitor sold at retail under the brand or label of both the retail seller and the person that produced the television or computer monitor, the person that produced the television or computer monitor or the person's successor in interest shall be the CED manufacturer."Clearinghouse." The independent organization authorized by section 6704 (relating to clearinghouse)."Collection convenience standard." The minimum number of collection opportunities that shall be provided for the collection of CEDs as required under section 6710 (relating to convenience standards for program collection sites).20250SB0856PN0957 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Collection obligation." The CED collection services that the clearinghouse assigns to a CED manufacturer for a given program year under section 6706 (relating to collection convenience standard compliance)."Collector." A person who collects residential CEDs at any program collection site or one-day collection event and prepares them for transport."Computer." As follows:(1) A desktop, all-in-one computer, laptop, notebook, e-reader or tablet computer marketed to and intended for use by residential purchasers and used only in a residence.(2) The term does not include an automated typewriter, electronic printer, mobile telephone, portable handheld calculator, portable digital assistant, MP3 player or other similar device or computer peripheral."Computer monitor." As follows:(1) An electronic device only used in a residence that has a cathode-ray tube or other panel display primarily intended to display information from a computer or other commonly used electronic device and marketed to and intended for use by residential purchasers.(2) The term does not include an all-in-one computer, laptop, notebook or tablet."Computer peripheral." A keyboard, mouse, cable or other device marketed to and intended for use by residential purchasers for external use with a computer."Covered electronic device" or "CED." As follows:(1) An electronic device under this chapter, including a computer, printer, videocassette recorder, portable digital music player, digital video disc player, computer peripheral, 20250SB0856PN0957 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer monitor or television.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An electronic device that is a part of a motor vehicle or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled by or for a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle.(ii) An electronic device that is functionally or physically part of a larger piece of equipment or that is taken out of service from an industrial, commercial, commercial retail, library checkout, traffic control, kiosk, security, other than household security, governmental, agricultural or medical setting, including diagnostic, monitoring or control equipment.(iii) An electronic device that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, water pump, sump pump or air purifier. To the extent allowed under Federal and State laws and regulations, a CED that is being collected, recycled or processed for reuse shall not be considered to be hazardous waste, household waste, solid waste or special waste."Covered electronic device category" or "CED category." Each of the following categories of residential CEDs:(1) Computers.(2) Computer monitors. (3) Televisions. (4) Printers. 20250SB0856PN0957 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Videocassette recorders, portable digital music players and digital video disc players.(6) CED peripheral. "Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Downstream processor." As follows:(1) An entity that is engaged in the repair, refurbishment or further processing of used components, parts, materials or residuals that result from disassembly of CEDs.(2) The term includes an entity engaged in a repair, refurbishing, disassembly, processing, recycling, energy recovery and disposal facility."Eco-fee." The amount added to the purchase price of new CEDs sold in this Commonwealth that is necessary to add to cover the costs of collecting, transporting and processing postpurchaser CEDs by local governments, individual CED manufacturers or stewardship organizations under an approved stewardship plan, and the costs borne by the department to fulfill its responsibilities to implement the program."Eco-fee sharing methodology." The methodology proposed to be implemented by the clearinghouse as part of the approved stewardship plan to disburse eco-fees to manufacturers, local governments and group plans."Environmental sound management." The practice of ensuring that all practicable steps are utilized in the management of hazardous and other wastes to protect human health and the environment against adverse effects."Group plan." Two or more CED manufacturers that are working jointly through a third-party entity to meet the requirements of 20250SB0856PN0957 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter."Manufacturer e-waste program." A program established, financed and operated by a manufacturer, either individually or collectively as part of a group plan, to transport and subsequently recycle, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, residential CEDs collected at program collection sites and one-day collection events."Market share." The percentage per CED manufactured as determined under section 6711 (relating to CED manufacturer recycling share responsibility) for the purposes of administering the requirements of the approved stewardship plans among the participating registered CED manufacturers."Marketplace facilitator." As defined in section 201(iii) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Marketplace seller." As defined in section 201(jjj) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Printer." As follows:(1) A desktop printer, multifunction printer, copier, scanner, facsimile machine and printer and fax combination taken out of service from a residence that is designed to reside on a work surface that includes various print technologies, including, without limitation, laser and LED, ink jet, dot matrix, thermal and digital sublimation and multifunction or all-in-one devices that perform different tasks, including, without limitation, copying, scanning, faxing and printing.(2) The term does not include a floor-standing printer, a printer with optional floor stand, a point of sale (POS) receipt printer, a household printer such as a calculator 20250SB0856PN0957 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with printing capabilities, a label maker or a non-stand-alone printer that is embedded into a product that is not a CED."Program collection site." A physical location that is included in a stewardship plan and at which residential CEDs are collected and prepared for transport by a collector during a program year in accordance with the requirements of this chapter."Program period." As follows:(1) Five calendar years.(2) The first program period shall start on March 31, 2026."Program year." As follows:(1) A year falling within a program period starting March 31, 2026.(2) The first program year shall start on the first day of the first program period."Purchaser." As defined in section 201(h) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Recycling." The process of preparing recyclable materials and reusing the materials in their original form or using them in manufacturing processes that do not cause the destruction of recyclable materials in a manner that precludes further use."Registered collector." As follows:(1) A unit of local government, manufacturer, retailer, charity or nongovernmental organization that collects CEDs in this Commonwealth as approved by a stewardship plan.(2) The term does not include a recycler."Residential CED." A CED produced or distributed:(1) for sale to a purchaser for use in or around a 20250SB0856PN0957 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permanent or temporary household or residence, in recreation or otherwise; or(2) for the personal use, consumption or enjoyment of a purchaser in or around a permanent or temporary household or residence, in recreation or otherwise."Retailer." A person or business that offers for sale, other than for resale by the purchaser, new CEDs in this Commonwealth by any means, including through sales outlets, catalogs and an Internet website."Return share." The percentage, by weight, of each CED category that is returned to program collection sites and one-day collection events operated by or on behalf of either a manufacturer or group plan or one or more of its participating manufacturers during the calendar year two years before the applicable program year, as reported to the department under section 6704, except that, for program year one and program year two, the term means the percentage, by weight, of each CED category that is estimated by the manufacturer program plan to be returned to those sites and events during the applicable program year, as reported to the department."Reuse." The use of electronic waste that is tested and certified to be in good working order and which was removed from the waste stream for use for the same purpose for which it was manufactured, including the continued use of whole systems or components."Sale." As follows:(1) A "sale at retail" as defined in section 201(k) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) The transfer of a previously owned CED, 20250SB0856PN0957 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including a CED that may have been refurbished by a manufacturer or other vendor and a purchaser-to-purchaser second-hand transfer of a CED.(ii) A lease of a CED.(iii) A wholesale transaction between a manufacturer and wholesaler."Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Stewardship plan." An annual plan prepared by an individual manufacturer or the plan prepared by the clearinghouse that aggregates the plans prepared by an individual manufacturer and the group plans."Television." An electronic device only used in a residence that contains a cathode-ray tube or other display screen type and is intended to receive video programming via broadcast, cable, satellite, Internet or other mode of video transmission, or to receive video from surveillance or other similar cameras, and is marketed to and intended for use by residential purchasers.§ 6703. Eco-fees and responsibilities.(a) Eco-fees.--On and after March 31, 2026, an eco-fee shall be imposed on each sale of a new CED purchased from a retailer in the amounts recommended by the clearinghouse in the eco-fee schedule approved by the department under this chapter. The following apply:(1) Except for a sale to a business, the retailer shall charge the purchaser the amount of the eco-fee at the time of sale.(2) For a sale facilitated by a marketplace facilitator, the marketplace facilitator shall charge the eco-fee to the 20250SB0856PN0957 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchaser on behalf of the marketplace seller.(b) Fee display.--(1) Eco-fees shall be separately displayed on the receipt, invoice, contract or other record documenting the sale of the new CED by a retailer to a purchaser in this Commonwealth.(2) The record must be visible to the purchaser at the time that the CED is sold to the purchaser.(3) For a sale made via an Internet website, catalog, telephone or any similar forum, the eco-fee shall be disclosed to the purchaser prior to completing the purchase.(c) Fee passage.--A retailer may not advertise, hold out or state to the public or to a purchaser, directly or indirectly, that the eco-fee or part of the eco-fee will not be added to the purchase price of the CED, will be paid by the retailer on behalf of the purchaser or will otherwise provide consideration of any kind, whether money or otherwise, to the purchaser that shifts the economic incidence of the eco-fee to a person other than the purchaser.(d) Fee reimbursement.--The retailer charging the eco-fee under subsection (a) may retain up to 3% of the fee as reimbursement for any costs associated with the collection of the fee. The remainder of the eco-fee collected by the retailer shall be remitted to the clearinghouse in a manner and form recommended by the clearinghouse and prescribed by the department and at the time the fee is required to be remitted under this chapter.(e) Penalty.--If a retailer or marketplace facilitator does not charge the eco-fee to the purchaser at the time of sale, the retailer or marketplace facilitator shall be liable for the full 20250SB0856PN0957 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount of the eco-fee and any applicable penalties under this chapter. The following apply:(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a marketplace facilitator shall not be held liable for payment of the eco-fee and any applicable penalties under this chapter if the marketplace facilitator can demonstrate to the clearinghouse's satisfaction that the failure to charge the eco-fee was due to incorrect information given to the marketplace facilitator by the marketplace seller.(2) If the demonstration under paragraph (1) is made, the marketplace seller shall be solely liable for payment of the eco-fee and any penalties under this chapter.(f) Remittance of eco-fee.--An eco-fee shall be due and payable to the clearinghouse no later than 60 days after the completion of each assessment period during which a CED has been sold by a retailer to a purchaser in this Commonwealth, less the reimbursements allowed under subsection (d) and any eco-fee refunded to purchasers for CEDs returned to the retailer in that assessment period for which an eco-fee has already been collected for remittance to the clearinghouse. All money required to be collected by a retailer under this chapter that is not properly remitted to the clearinghouse shall be deemed to be a debt owed to the clearinghouse by the retailer.(g) Prohibition on sale.--A retailer may not sell or offer for sale in this Commonwealth a new CED after the program year begins unless:(1) The retailer registers with the clearinghouse.(2) The brand of the CED is included on the list of manufacturers that are registered with the clearinghouse and maintained by the clearinghouse.20250SB0856PN0957 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) An eco-fee is collected on sales of CEDs and remitted in a timely manner to the clearinghouse.(h) Noncompliance.--A retailer shall cease sale of a manufacturer's CEDs within seven days of receipt of notice from the clearinghouse or department that a manufacturer has failed to comply with the requirements of this chapter. The retailer may recommence the sale only upon written confirmation from the clearinghouse or department that the manufacturer has remedied noncompliance.(i) Duty of retailer to consult registry.--Beginning no later than 12 months after the effective date of this subsection, a retailer of new CEDs to be offered for sale to purchasers in this Commonwealth shall consult the registry under subsection (j) prior to selling new CEDs in this Commonwealth. The following apply:(1) With respect to the sale of a CED through a marketplace facilitator, the marketplace seller shall consult the registry prior to advertising, listing or selling new CEDs in this Commonwealth through a marketplace facilitator.(2) A manufacturer shall be considered to have complied with this subsection if, on the date that the new CED was ordered by the retailer, the brand was included on the registry of CED manufacturers and CEDs and is posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(j) Registration with clearinghouse.--A retailer shall register with the clearinghouse and receive a remitter identification number from the clearinghouse prior to collecting any eco-fee and remitting any eco-fee to the clearinghouse.(k) Audit.--The clearinghouse may, at its discretion and as directed by the department , conduct an audit of a registered 20250SB0856PN0957 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retailer to verify that the eco-fees collected and remitted to the clearinghouse are proper and accurate. The following apply:(1) Each audit under this subsection shall be limited to the prior three years from the date the audit is requested by the clearinghouse.(2) Unless a retailer has previously been found in violation of this chapter for remittance of an eco-fee, an audit may be conducted in person or via the Internet and email at the discretion of the retailer.(3) If a retailer has previously violated any provision of this chapter, the audit conducted under this subsection must be conducted in person.(4) A retailer must make the following records available for inspection:(i) Receipts of sales.(ii) Invoices.(iii) Other records generally kept by the retailer detailing the collection and payment of eco-fees.§ 6704. Clearinghouse.(a) Designation.--(1) The department shall designate as the clearinghouse an organization that meets all of the requirements under subsection (b).(2) Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall designate the clearinghouse.(3) The designation under this subsection shall be valid for not less than five years.(4) The clearinghouse may be renewed by the department not to exceed five years at any time.(b) Requirements.--The clearinghouse:20250SB0856PN0957 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Must be incorporated as a nonprofit organization in this Commonwealth.(2) May not control, be controlled by or be under common control with any single manufacturer, third-party organization, collector or industrywide trade association.(3) Shall demonstrate to the department the management capability and financial capacity to operate a Statewide program.(4) Shall represent two or more manufacturers cooperating with one another to collectively establish and operate a manufacturer e-waste program for the purpose of complying with this chapter, and that collectively represents at least 50% of the manufacturers' total collection and recycling obligation under this chapter for the first program year.(5) Must be governed by a board of directors, no more than 50% of which may represent manufacturers. Representatives from local governments, the department, registered collectors and recyclers must also be present on the board of directors.(6) Shall create a multistate advisory group composed of two representatives from each state in which the clearinghouse is approved to operate. The clearinghouse board shall meet with the multistate advisory group at least twice a year.(7) Shall deposit all revenue from the eco-fee established under subsection (c) in a bank chartered in this Commonwealth.(c) Management of eco-fees.--(1) The clearinghouse shall establish an eco-fee for 20250SB0856PN0957 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each category of CEDs under section 6708 (relating to CED manufacturer requirements) as part of the stewardship plan of the clearinghouse.(2) The clearinghouse shall be responsible for:(i) Collecting, in a timely manner, all eco-fees due from a retailer.(ii) Ensuring that all eco-fees collected from the sales of CEDs to consumers in this Commonwealth are used solely for the clearinghouse responsibilities under this section.(iii) Reviewing and compiling information from manufacturers and group plans to be included in the stewardship plan for submission to the advisory committee for review and approval or disapproval before submittal to the department.(iv) Disbursing money to manufacturers, or their group plans, and local governments participating in approved programs for the collection and recycling of CEDs.(v) Oversight and enforcement recommendations under this chapter.(vi) Disbursing eco-fees remitted to the clearinghouse only to the entities and for the purposes allowed by subsection (e).(vii) Providing dispute resolution for local government and other collection sites to resolve service issues with the assigned recycler under a group plan.(d) Deposit of eco-fees.--The clearinghouse shall deposit the eco-fees collected under this chapter in accounts that are maintained and disbursed in this Commonwealth by the 20250SB0856PN0957 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clearinghouse.(e) Allowed expenditures.--As approved by the department as part of the clearinghouse's stewardship plan, eco-fees collected by the clearinghouse may be used as follows:(1) The clearinghouse shall disburse at least a majority of the total eco-fees collected each program year to collectors that have been approved by the clearinghouse to receive collector incentive payments to subsidize collection site costs under the stewardship plan approved by the department and that are in compliance with section 6716 (relating to collector responsibilities).(2) Unless otherwise directed by the department, the clearinghouse shall not be required to disburse any eco-fees to any CED manufacturer or group plan that has failed to meet its collection obligations under the terms of an approved stewardship plan.(3) The clearinghouse may use funds withheld under paragraph (2) to reimburse a CED manufacturer or group plan of the clearinghouse's choosing to provide collection-related services to resolve the collection obligation deficiencies for which the funds were withheld.(4) Any funds expended under paragraph (3) shall be deducted from any eco-fees owed to the CED manufacturer or stewardship organization from which the funds were withheld.(5) The clearinghouse may expend eco-fee funds on public education programs intended to encourage the collection and recycling of CEDs.(6) The clearinghouse may disburse collection incentive payments to local governments, CED manufacturers and group plans as stated in an approved stewardship plan. T o receive 20250SB0856PN0957 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the collection incentive payments, a local government need not comply with the requirements under section 6716.(f) Reserve and reimbursement.--(1) The clearinghouse shall maintain a prudent reserve of funds not to exceed 25% of the forthcoming program year's estimated annual gross eco-fee collection.(2) The clearinghouse may recover its annual operating expenses of administering the eco-fee and performing its mandatory duties under this chapter.(3) The clearinghouse shall submit all expenses to the department as part of the annual stewardship plan and shall include expenses in the overall cost calculation for the eco-fee.(4) The approved operating expenses of the clearinghouse shall be paid prior to the expenditure of any eco-fee under subsection (e) for each assessment period.(5) The clearinghouse shall pay the department an administrative fee as described in section 6719 (relating to administrative reimbursement).§ 6705. Stewardship plan.The clearinghouse shall:(1) Consolidate plans from all registered individual manufacturers and group plans for submission to the advisory committee and department annually as part of the stewardship plan.(2) Review information from manufacturers and group plans submitted under paragraph (1) to confirm that the collection convenience criteria established in this section has been met by all registered manufacturers in the aggregate and that all registered manufacturers or group plans will 20250SB0856PN0957 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meet collection obligations. The following apply:(i) If a gap in collection site or event coverage is identified, the clearinghouse shall notify all manufacturers and group plans of the gap and provide manufacturers and group plans 30 days to remedy the identified gap in coverage. Notice under this paragraph shall include the specific areas for which the department believes additional collection sites or events are needed.(ii) If a manufacturer or group plan is not able to remedy a gap in coverage under this paragraph, the clearinghouse may assign the areas to a manufacturer or group plan at the discretion of the clearinghouse.(3) Annually submit to the advisory committee and department a stewardship plan that contains the individual manufacturer and group plans for all registered manufacturers that have submitted information to the clearinghouse. The stewardship plan must, at a minimum, include the following information:(i) Copies of all individual manufacturer and group plans submitted to the clearinghouse by manufacturers.(ii) An estimate of the total program year costs for upcoming program years, including the cost of the services of the clearinghouse.(iii) A schedule of the specific eco-fee amounts, not to exceed $10 for each category of CED sold in this Commonwealth, and a description of tiered fees for different items.(iv) A proposed eco-fee sharing methodology to disburse eco-fees to registered collectors and local 20250SB0856PN0957 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governments to subsidize the costs related to collection and transportation of CEDs, as well as to manufacturers and group plans if deemed necessary by the clearinghouse and the advisory committee.(v) A description of the promotion and outreach activities that will be used to encourage participation in the collection and recycling programs and how the activities' effectiveness will be evaluated.(vi) A description of the materials regarding the eco-fee that will be provided to retailers to inform purchasers of the eco-fee and the overall program.(vii) A description of the methods by which CEDs will be collected in all areas in this Commonwealth according to the collection convenience standard, including an explanation of how the collection system will be convenient and adequate to residents in both urban and rural areas on an ongoing basis.(viii) A discussion of the status of end markets for one or more materials that result from the dismantling and recycling of CEDs and what, if any, additional end markets are needed to improve the functioning of the program.§ 6706. Collection convenience standard compliance.(a) Collection allocation.--The clearinghouse shall allocate the CED manufacturers' collection obligation to arrange for pickup, transportation and recycling of CEDs from program collection sites to each registered CED manufacturer or the CED manufacturer's group plan. When allocating collection obligations, the clearinghouse shall:(1) Allocate by a type of equipment to ensure that CED 20250SB0856PN0957 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturers are responsible for recovering all types of CEDs that manufacturers have placed or currently place on the market.(2) Allocate current CED manufacturers recycling obligation per CED category and require the CED manufacturer or group plan to pick up each CED category type that the manufacturer currently markets.(3) Take into account, to the best ability of the clearinghouse, those collection site relationships already in existence between a collector and a CED manufacturer or group plan.(4) Balance the allocation of collection sites to CED manufacturers in both urban and rural areas.(5) To the extent practical, assign collection obligations that are reasonably anticipated to enable the CED manufacturer to collect a volume of CEDs equivalent to the manufacturer's return share determined under section 6711 (relating to CED manufacturer recycling share responsibility).(b) Budget.--The clearinghouse shall prepare and submit a budget to the department for each program year as part of the stewardship plan. The budget shall contain:(1) An estimate of the total number of CEDs to be collected in the upcoming program year.(2) The estimated total program year costs and the eco-fees expected to be remitted.(c) Registry.--(1) No later than six months after the effective date of this subsection, the clearinghouse shall maintain a list of each registered CED manufacturer, the brands of all CEDs 20250SB0856PN0957 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reported in each manufacturer's registration and, to the best of its knowledge, the brands of CEDs for which no CED manufacturer has registered.(2) The registry shall be available on the publicly accessible Internet website of the clearinghouse.(d) Eco-fee-sharing arrangement.--Within 90 days of the department's designation of a clearinghouse or within 90 days of approval of a stewardship plan, whichever occurs later:(1) All manufacturers, group plans and other designated recipients of eco-fee money, which are listed in the stewardship plan, shall enter into an eco-fee-sharing arrangement with the clearinghouse. The clearinghouse shall notify the advisory committee and department of each eco-fee-sharing agreement within 30 days of entering into the agreement.(2) If a funding recipient cannot reach an agreement on an eco-fee-sharing arrangement with the clearinghouse within 90 days, the clearinghouse shall submit a proposed eco-fee-sharing structure to the advisory committee and department for approval. Upon approval, the approved eco-fee-sharing structure shall be binding upon the clearinghouse and the relevant manufacturer or group plan for the entirety of the relevant program year.(e) Clearinghouse powers.--The clearinghouse:(1) May enter into a joint venture, agreement or contract with a third party, including a corporation, partnership, nonprofit entity or governmental agency, to undertake an activity on the clearinghouse's behalf that is consistent with this chapter.(2) Shall keep minutes, books and records that clearly 20250SB0856PN0957 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reflect the activities and transactions of the clearinghouse.(3) May conduct audits of retailers, collection sites, downstream processors, recyclers, CED manufacturers and group plans.(f) Memorandum of understanding.--(1) The department and the clearinghouse shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, the terms of which shall specify the performance of the duties and powers of the clearinghouse under this chapter.(2) The clearinghouse shall be paid for its services solely out of eco-fees collected and remitted to the clearinghouse under this chapter.(g) Clearinghouse audit.--(1) The accounting books of the clearinghouse shall be audited at the clearinghouse's expense by an independent certified public accountant retained by the clearinghouse at least once each calendar year.(2) The clearinghouse shall arrange for the audit to be delivered to the department, along with the annual report required under section 6708 (relating to CED manufacturer requirements).(3) The department shall review the audit for compliance with this chapter and shall notify the clearinghouse of any compliance issues or inconsistencies.(4) The department may not disclose any proprietary information in the audit.§ 6707. Eco-fee.(a) Program costs.--At least 180 days prior to the beginning of a program year, each CED manufacturer or group plan shall submit to the clearinghouse an estimate of the total program 20250SB0856PN0957 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 costs for collection and recycling of CEDs for the upcoming program year.(b) Submission of market share information to clearinghouse.--By December of each year prior to the beginning of a program year, the department shall estimate each CED manufacturer's market share, using eco-fee sharing methodology , based on either national sales data for the previous calendar year that is provided by registered manufacturers upon request of the department or on reliable, commercially available national sales data from the previous calendar year. The following apply:(1) A CED manufacturer may dispute the manufacturer's assigned sales data and market share if the sales data is procured from commercially available sources. The dispute must be made in writing within 30 days of notification of the assigned market share to the CED manufacturer.(2) The department shall submit each manufacturer's estimated market share to registered CED manufacturers and the clearinghouse.(3) National sales data submitted by a registered CED manufacturer to the department or procured independently by the department under this section shall not be subject to access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, and may not be disclosed by the department or the clearinghouse unless otherwise required by law or court order.(c) Approval.--The eco-fees shall be approved by the advisory committee and department within 30 days after submission by the clearinghouse of the stewardship plan on each even-numbered year if the proposed eco-fees meet the following 20250SB0856PN0957 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements:(1) To the extent possible, the eco-fee shall be uniform for each type of CED and consistent with the eco-fee amount that is being assessed in other jurisdictions participating in the clearinghouse incorporated in this Commonwealth.(2) The eco-fees shall be sufficient to cover program year costs for the collection, preparation, transportation and recycling of CEDs for all CED manufacturers, group plans and local governments with an approved plan for the collection of CEDs and all other expenditures authorized under this chapter and approved as part of the stewardship plan.(d) Adjustment of eco-fee.--(1) At least 120 days prior to the beginning of a program year starting two years or more after the start of the program period and thereafter only every year for which the eco-fee was most recently approved by the department, the clearinghouse and the advisory committee may submit to the department a recommendation regarding eco-fees to be collected by a retailer under section 6703 (relating to eco-fees and responsibilities) in accordance with subsection (c).(2) Any adjustment to the eco-fee must take into consideration the following factors:(i) Current and projected sale rates of CEDs in this Commonwealth.(ii) Current and projected collection rates for discarded CEDs.(iii) The costs associated with the collection, transportation and recycling of CEDs.(iv) Program administrative costs.20250SB0856PN0957 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Other expenditures authorized by section 6704(e) (relating to clearinghouse) and approved as part of the stewardship plan.(e) Approval of adjustment.--A proposal to adjust an eco-fee shall be approved by the department within 30 days after submission by the clearinghouse of the proposal if the proposed eco-fee meets the requirements of subsections (c) and (d).§ 6708. CED manufacturer requirements.(a) Collection and recycling.--Each manufacturer of CEDs sold in this Commonwealth shall either:(1) operate an individual manufacturer program to collect and recycle CEDs in this Commonwealth; or(2) under section 6709 (relating to group plan requirements), participate in a group plan to collect and recycle CEDs in this Commonwealth.(b) Registration.--(1) On or before December 31, 2025, and each year thereafter, each CED manufacturer shall register with the department and the clearinghouse, for the purpose of complying with this chapter, and provide the following information:(i) A list of the CED manufacturer's brands of CEDs offered for sale in this Commonwealth.(ii) The name, address and contact information of a person responsible for ensuring compliance with this chapter.(iii) Certification that the CED manufacturer has complied with and will continue to comply with the requirements of this chapter.(iv) The total number of CEDs sold in this 20250SB0856PN0957 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth for the most recently concluded program year.(v) Identification of the group plan, if any, that represents the CED manufacturer.(2) A person that becomes a CED manufacturer after March 31, 2026, shall register with the clearinghouse under this subsection no later than 60 days after becoming a CED manufacturer.(c) Notifications.--A CED manufacturer shall provide retail partners with annual written or emailed notifications regarding the CEDs that are to be assessed an eco-fee and the requirements for remittance. If participating in a group plan, a CED manufacturer shall submit to the group plan a summary of individual collection and recycling activities in this Commonwealth on a form specified by the clearinghouse.(d) Annual report.--Each CED manufacturer or its group plan shall submit an annual report to the clearinghouse and department that describes the CED manufacturer's program outcomes for the concluded program year, including the specific program collection sites serviced.§ 6709. Group plan requirements.(a) Group plans.--A CED manufacturer may enter into an agreement with a group plan to fulfill the CED manufacturer's obligations under this chapter. The following apply:(1) The group plan shall act as the representative of all CED manufacturers that it represents for purposes of this chapter.(2) The clearinghouse shall receive information on collection and recycling programs from individual member companies or their group plans on a form provided by the 20250SB0856PN0957 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clearinghouse.(3) The clearinghouse shall compile the individual manufacturer and group plan information into a stewardship plan to be reviewed and approved by the department under section 6705 (relating to stewardship plan).(b) Requirements.--(1) A group plan shall receive eco-fee disbursements from the clearinghouse on behalf of the CED manufacturers the group program plan represents.(2) The group plan shall solely be responsible for disbursing eco-fee funds to individual CED manufacturers per the mechanism and amounts as determined by agreements with the CED manufacturers that the group plan represents.(3) The clearinghouse shall have no liability to individual CED manufacturers that are members of group plans to the extent that the clearinghouse timely and accurately disburses collected eco-fees to the CED manufacturer's group plan.(4) A group plan may contract for service in areas not served by individual CED manufacturer programs participating in the group plan to fulfill the participating CED manufacturers' obligations for those areas.(c) Audits.--The clearinghouse may conduct an audit of CED manufacturers and group plans, utilizing third-party independent auditors, to ensure that CED manufacturers and group plans have implemented programs in accordance with approved group plans and are meeting collection obligations in each program year. The following apply:(1) An audit conducted under this subsection shall be carried out in accordance with generally accepted auditing 20250SB0856PN0957 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practices and shall be limited in scope to determining whether eco-fees have been properly collected on all sales of CEDs to purchasers in this Commonwealth.(2) An audit shall be limited to three years prior to the date that the clearinghouse informs the auditee of the audit.§ 6710. Convenience standards for program collection sites.(a) Collection sites.--Beginning March 31, 2026, each CED manufacturer or group plan must include in the submission to the clearinghouse, at a minimum, the number of program collection sites assigned to the manufacturer by the clearinghouse as part of the manufacturer's recycling obligation for a program year based on the following collection convenience standards:(1) One program collection site in each county that has a population density that is less than 250 individuals per square mile.(2) Two program collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 250 individuals per square mile but less than 500 individuals per square mile.(3) Three program collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 500 individuals per square mile but less than 750 individuals per square mile.(4) Four program collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 750 individuals per square mile but less than 1,000 individuals per square mile.(5) Five program collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 20250SB0856PN0957 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1,000 individuals per square mile but less than 5,000 individuals per square mile.(6) Fifteen program collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 5,000 individuals per square mile.(7) If a municipality has a population of more than 1,000,000 residents, the program shall provide 10 additional program collection sites for the program year to be located in that municipality, and the program collection sites required under paragraph (6) shall be located outside of the municipality.(b) Additional sites.--Collection sites such as those operated by local governments, retailers, charities or other entities shall be eligible for consideration as program collection sites.(c) Population density calculation.--For purposes of this section, county population densities shall be based on the entire county's population density, regardless of whether a municipality or municipal joint action agency in the county participates in a CED manufacturer e-waste program. For municipalities with a population density less than 5,000, collection events may be held in lieu of permanent collection sites if the events are efficient and effective at providing collection opportunities for the residents of those areas.(d) Written agreement permitted.--(1) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, a program collection site operator may enter into a written agreement with the operators of a group plan or CED manufacturer individually in order to do one or more of the following:20250SB0856PN0957 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Decrease the number of program collection sites in the jurisdiction for the program year.(ii) Substitute a program collection site in the jurisdiction with either:(A) four one-day collection events; or(B) a different number of events as may be provided in the written agreement.(iii) Substitute the location of a program collection site in the jurisdiction for the program year with another location.(iv) Substitute the location of a one-day collection event in the jurisdiction with another location.(2) Any changes to the number and location of program collection sites described under this section must be provided in writing to the department and posted on the individual CED manufacturer's or clearinghouse's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Ease of access.--Collection sites assigned to the CED manufacturer or group plan must maintain reasonable days and hours of operation to ensure access to the public throughout the year.§ 6711. CED manufacturer recycling share responsibility.(a) Return share invoicing.--(1) At each registered collection site under this chapter, collectors shall log the brand and type, as delineated by the department, of CEDs brought to the collection site.(2) The information under paragraph (1) shall be sent to the clearinghouse, which shall subsequently invoice CED manufacturers regarding the amount and location of the CEDs 20250SB0856PN0957 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required to be recycled.(b) Requirement.--A CED manufacturer shall accept and recycle any CED that it has produced and is or was sold in this Commonwealth and that is brought to the collection site.§ 6712. Individual manufacturer and group plans.(a) Plan submission.--Each CED manufacturer that participates in the clearinghouse either individually or through a group plan shall, each program year, submit to the clearinghouse a plan on the form provided by the clearinghouse that demonstrates how the CED manufacturer meets the requirements of this chapter. The following apply:(1) The plan must be submitted to the clearinghouse at least 90 days before the beginning of the program year.(2) The clearinghouse shall then aggregate all individual manufacturer and group plans and submit as part of the stewardship plan described in section 6705 (relating to stewardship plan) to the department for review and approval at least 60 days prior to the beginning of the program year as part of the stewardship plan.(b) Plan requirements.--The plan submitted by each CED manufacturer to the clearinghouse must contain the following information:(1) Contact information for the individual and the entity submitting the program plan, a list of all CED manufacturers or brand owners participating in the program and the brands covered by the program plan.(2) Identification of the types of CEDs sold in this Commonwealth by the CED manufacturer and a statement that the manufacturer acknowledges the obligation to collect and recycle CEDs of a similar type. The following apply:20250SB0856PN0957 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) If a CED manufacturer does not manufacture CEDs sold in this Commonwealth, but intends to voluntarily collect and recycle CEDs, the CED manufacturer shall identify the types of CEDs that the CED manufacturer intends to voluntarily collect and recycle.(ii) If the CED manufacturer has identified any types of CEDs under this paragraph, a separate description of the methods by which the identified types of CEDs will be collected in all areas in this Commonwealth according to the collection convenience standard, including an explanation of how the collection system will be convenient and adequate to residents in both urban and rural areas on an ongoing basis.(3) The names, locations and updated contact information of program collection sites and recyclers that will manage the collected material.(4) A description of how components will be safely and securely transported, tracked and handled from collection through final recycling and processing.(5) A description of the methods that will be used to recycle CEDs.(6) Evidence of adequate insurance and financial assurance that may be required for collection, handling and disposal operations.(7) Five-year performance goals, including an estimate of the percentage of CEDs that will be collected during each of the first five years of the program.(8) A commitment to the reuse and refurbishment of CEDs to any recycling and disposal activities.(9) Agreements with local governments containing 20250SB0856PN0957 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commitments to pay for the costs of collecting and preparing the CEDs.(c) New program plan.--A CED manufacturer or group plan may submit a new program plan to the clearinghouse prior to the completion of the current program year with the consent of the department.§ 6713. Review of stewardship plan.(a) Department review.--The advisory committee and department shall review the stewardship plan submitted by the clearinghouse under section 6712 (relating to individual manufacturer and group plans) and, within 30 days of receipt of the plan, determine whether the plan provides the information required. If the plan contains the required information, the advisory committee shall recommend approval of the plan and the department shall approve the plan.(b) Notification.--(1) If the advisory committee and department approve the plan under subsection (a), the department shall notify the clearinghouse and the registered CED manufacturers.(2) If the department rejects the plan, in whole or in part, the department shall notify the clearinghouse and provide the reasons for the plan's rejection. Rejection of a plan shall be based on the plan's failure to provide the information required under subsection (a).(c) Plan revisions.--Within 30 days after receipt of the department's rejection under subsection (b), the CED manufacturers or group plans may revise and resubmit the plan to the clearinghouse. The clearinghouse shall submit the revised stewardship plan to the advisory committee and department.(d) Requirements under stewardship plan.--Individual 20250SB0856PN0957 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturers and group plans operating under an approved stewardship plan shall:(1) Ensure availability of collection and recycling infrastructure.(2) Track and measure collection and recycling.(3) Develop and provide guidance to all participants in the program.(4) Develop best management practices for program collection sites.(5) Assume financial responsibility for carrying out the manufacturer e-waste program plans of the individual manufacturers and group plans under an approved stewardship plan, including financial responsibility for providing the packaging materials necessary to prepare shipments of collected residential CEDs in compliance with section 6716(e) (relating to collector responsibilities), as well as financial responsibility for bulk transportation and recycling of collected residential CEDs.(e) Changes to individual manufacturer and group plans.--A CED manufacturer or group plan participating under the approved stewardship plan may submit changes to the clearinghouse. With consent of the department, the clearinghouse shall revise and submit the stewardship plan to the department for review and approval prior to the completion of the current program period.§ 6714. Fees for collection or recycling of eligible devices.No registered collector in a group or stewardship plan may charge any fee or cost to a purchaser for the collection, transportation or recycling of a CED unless a financial incentive of equal or greater value is provided to the purchaser. The financial incentive may be in the form of a 20250SB0856PN0957 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coupon or rebate.§ 6715. Recycler responsibilities.(a) Recycler registration.--By January 1 of each program year, a person acting as a recycler under a clearinghouse stewardship plan shall register with the department by completing and submitting to the department the registration form prescribed by the department. The registration form prescribed by the department must include, without limitation, the address of each location at which the recycler processes CEDs.(b) Denial of registration.--The department may deny a registration under this section if the recycler or an employee or officer of the recycler has a history of:(1) repeated violations of Federal, State or local laws, regulations, standards or ordinances related to the collection, recycling or other management of CEDs;(2) conviction in this Commonwealth or another state of a crime that is a felony under the laws of this Commonwealth;(3) conviction of a felony in a Federal court or conviction in this Commonwealth or another Federal or state court of forgery, official misconduct, bribery, perjury or knowingly submitting false information under any environmental law, regulation or permit term or condition; or(4) gross carelessness or incompetence in handling, storing, processing, transporting, disposing or otherwise managing CEDs.(c) Notice of recyclers available.--(1) The department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of all registered recyclers that are participating in the program.20250SB0856PN0957 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Beginning in program year one, no person may act as a recycler of residential CEDs for an individual manufacturer or group plan unless the recycler is registered with the department and meets all requirements related to recycling under this section.§ 6716. Collector responsibilities.(a) Collector registration.--By January 1 of each program year, a person acting as a collector under a stewardship plan shall register with the department by completing and submitting to the department the registration form prescribed by the department. The registration form prescribed by the department must include, without limitation, the address of each location at which the collector accepts CEDs.(b) Registration permitted.--The department shall grant a collector's registration under this section unless the collector, or any employee or officer of the collector, has a history of:(1) repeated violations of Federal, State or local laws, regulations, standards or ordinances related to the collection, recycling or other management of CEDs;(2) conviction in this Commonwealth or another state of a crime that is a felony under the laws of this Commonwealth;(3) conviction of a felony in a Federal court or conviction in this Commonwealth or another Federal or state court of forgery, official misconduct, bribery, perjury or knowingly submitting false information under any environmental law, regulation or permit term or condition; or(4) gross carelessness or incompetence in handling, storing, processing, transporting, disposing or otherwise managing CEDs.20250SB0856PN0957 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Registered collector notice.--The department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of all registered collectors. Manufacturers and recyclers acting as collectors shall so indicate on their registration with the department.(d) Report of weight.--By March 1 of each program year, each collector that operates a program collection site or one-day collection event shall report, to the department and to the individual manufacturer or group plan, the total weight, by CED category, of residential CEDs transported from the program collection site or one-day collection event during the previous program year.(e) Best management practices.--The clearinghouse shall provide registered collectors with best management practices that address packaging, containers, average shipment weights and other items that pertain to the collection of CEDs.(f) Acceptance of CEDs.--All categories of residential CEDs must be accepted at the program collection site or one-day collection event unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The following apply:(1) Residential CEDs shall be kept separate from other material and shall be:(i) Packaged in a manner to prevent breakage.(ii) Loaded onto pallets and secured with plastic wrap or in pallet-sized bulk containers prior to shipping.(iii) On average, per collection site, 18,000 pounds per shipment and, if not, the recycler may be subject to a reduction in the collection incentive payment for those pounds.20250SB0856PN0957 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Half box semi-trailer loads shall be permitted from program collection sites that cannot accommodate larger trailers.(3) CEDs shall be sorted into the following categories:(i) Computers. (ii) Computer monitors.(iii) Televisions.(iv) Printers.(v) Videocassette recorders, portable digital music players and digital video disc players.(vi) CED peripheral.(vii) Any electronic device that is not part of the individual manufacturer or group plan that the collector has arranged to have picked up with residential CEDs and for which a financial arrangement has been made to cover the recycling costs outside of the manufacturer program.(4) Containers holding the CEDs must be structurally sound for transportation and meet applicable requirements of the United States Department of Transportation and the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth.(5) Each shipment of residential CEDs from a program collection site or one-day collection event shall include a collector-prepared bill of lading or similar manifest, which describes the origin of the shipment and the number of pallets or bulk containers of residential CEDs in the shipment.(g) Acceptance.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each collector that operates a program collection site or one-day collection event during a program year shall accept all 20250SB0856PN0957 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residential CEDs that are delivered to the program collection site or one-day collection event during the program year.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, no collector that operates a program collection site or one-day collection event shall:(i) Be required to accept, at the program collection site or one-day collection event, more than seven CEDs from a person at any one time.(ii) Scrap, salvage, dismantle or otherwise disassemble any CED collected at a program collection site or one-day collection event.(iii) Deliver to a CED manufacturer or group plan, through its recycler, a CED other than a residential CED collected at a program collection site or one-day collection event.(iv) Deliver to a person other than the CED manufacturer or group plan a residential CED collected at a program collection site or one-day collection event.(h) Limitation.--Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a person from acting as a collector independently of a manufacturer or group plan, but all collectors must register with the department in order to accept CEDs.§ 6717. Annual reports.(a) Group plan or individual manufacturer annual report.--Each group plan or individual manufacturer operating under the approved stewardship plan shall each prepare and submit by May 1, 2028, and annually thereafter to the clearinghouse and post on its publicly accessible Internet website a report that includes:(1) The total weight of CEDs collected as a result of 20250SB0856PN0957 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the individual manufacturer's or group plan's responsibilities under the stewardship plan.(2) A complete listing of the amount of CEDs, by weight for each type, collected at each site serviced.(3) Recommendations, if any, for changes to the list of CEDs.(b) Clearinghouse report.--(1) By June 1, 2028, and each June 1 thereafter, the clearinghouse shall prepare and submit annually to the department a report that includes the following:(i) The total sum of eco-fees which were required to be collected from retailers during the program year, including any amounts not remitted or in default.(ii) The total sum of eco-fees disbursed to CED manufacturers or group plans during the prior program year, including any unpaid or uncollected eco-fees.(iii) The total sum of eco-fees disbursed to registered collectors.(iv) The total weight of CEDs collected under the stewardship plan.(v) A complete listing of the amount of CEDs, by weight for each type, collected at each site serviced.(vi) Recommendations, if any, for changes to the list of CEDs.(2) Each report under this subsection shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the clearinghouse.(c) Department report.--The department shall prepare and submit annually to the General Assembly, according to procedures and deadlines determined by the department, a report that 20250SB0856PN0957 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 includes:(1) The total weight of CEDs collected under this chapter in this Commonwealth during the previous plan year.(2) Stated separately, the total weight of CEDs collected under this chapter in this Commonwealth during the previous plan year.(3) A complete listing of all of the individual and group plans operating in this Commonwealth during the prior program year, the parties that operated the group plans and the amount of CEDs, by weight for each type, collected at each site included in the stewardship plan.(4) Recommendations, if any, for changes to the list of CEDs.§ 6718. Advisory committee.(a) Establishment and purpose.--The Advisory Committee on Electronic Waste Recycling is established within the department to provide input on the functioning of the electronics recycling program in this Commonwealth as well as oversight and approval on the measures specified in this chapter, including eco-fees and stewardship plans.(b) Members.--(1) The secretary shall appoint up to 11 members to the advisory committee.(2) The advisory committee shall be composed of individuals who represent:(i) The environmental community.(ii) The solid waste industry.(iii) Local governments.(iv) Public and private entities involved in the collection, processing and recycling of electronic 20250SB0856PN0957 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 devices.(v) Other interested parties as identified by the secretary.(c) Stewardship plans.--(1) The clearinghouse shall provide to the advisory committee a copy of the stewardship plan and any amendments to the stewardship plan no fewer than 15 days before submitting the stewardship plan and any amendments to the stewardship plan to the department.(2) The advisory committee shall provide comments and recommendations regarding the stewardship plan or amendments to the stewardship plan to the clearinghouse and to the department based on the advisory committee's review under this section.(3) The advisory committee shall provide recommendations to the department regarding the approval of fees and stewardship strategies.(d ) Compensation.--A member of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.§ 6719. Administrative reimbursement.(a) Annual reimbursement fee.--The clearinghouse, when submitting a stewardship plan, shall pay an annual reimbursement fee to the department for the costs of administering this chapter.(b) Cost identification.--(1) Prior to July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall identify the costs incurred under this section.20250SB0856PN0957 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department shall set the fee under this section at an amount that is adequate to reimburse the department's full costs of administering this chapter.(3) The total amount of annual fees collected under this section shall not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse costs incurred by the department to administer this section.(c) Administrative fee.--(1) The clearinghouse shall pay the department's administrative fee under subsection (a) on or before July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter.(2) The clearinghouse shall collect the administrative fee from manufacturers that sell CEDs in this Commonwealth. The share of the fee that is charged to each manufacturer shall be determined by the manufacturer's share of the total amount of CEDs sold by weight in this Commonwealth in the previous year.§ 6720. Environmental sound management requirements.(a) Recycling.--CEDs collected through any program in this Commonwealth, whether by a CED manufacturer, retailer, for-profit or not-for-profit corporation or unit of government, shall be recycled in a manner that is in compliance with all applicable Federal, State and local laws, regulations and ordinances and may not be exported for disposal in a manner that poses a significant risk to the public health or the environment.(b) Performance requirements.--All entities shall, at a minimum, demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the facility to be used to recycle CEDs has achieved and maintained certification from an ANSI-ASQ National Accreditation Board-accredited third-party certification body to an 20250SB0856PN0957 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 environmentally sound management standard.(c) Required disclosure.--Each entity shall provide information about its certification and its standing to the department along with any other requirements regarding this section that may be mandated by Federal or State law. The department shall make this information available on its publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Department to maintain publicly accessible Internet website.--The department shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website that includes a list of entities and organizations that have registered with the department. The website shall contain a list of the locations of all collection sites, hours of operation and any other information that will be helpful to purchasers in understanding where and how they can recycle CEDs.§ 6721. Disposal ban.(a) Prohibition.--A person may not place in municipal solid waste a CED or any of its components, excluding any nonhazardous residuals produced during recycling in any solid waste disposal facility.(b) Hold harmless.--An owner or operator of a solid waste disposal facility may not be found in violation of this section if the owner or operator has:(1) made a good faith effort to comply with this section;(2) posted in a conspicuous location at the facility a sign stating that CEDs or any of their components shall not be accepted at the facility; and(3) notified, in writing, all registered collectors registered to deposit solid waste at the facility that those 20250SB0856PN0957 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 devices or their components shall not be accepted at the facility.(c) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "facility":(1) Shall have the same meaning as in section 103 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act.(2) Does not include a transfer station.§ 6722. Enforcement.(a) Authorization.--The Commonwealth, through the Attorney General and the department, may initiate independent action to enforce any provision of this chapter.(b) Enforcement expenses.--Any money awarded by a court shall be used first to offset enforcement expenses. Money in excess of the enforcement expenses shall be provided to the clearinghouse for use in the recycling of CEDs and the other expenditures authorized by this chapter.(c) Civil penalties.--Except as provided in subsection (d), a person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter may be assessed by the department a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. The maximum penalty under this subsection for a related series of violations shall be $10,000.(d) Additional penalties.--(1) A person who willfully sells a CED in violation of section 6703 (relating to eco-fees and responsibilities) may be assessed by the department a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. The maximum penalty under this paragraph, for any and all sales in violation of this subsection, shall be $10,000 for each assessment period during which the sales occur.20250SB0856PN0957 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A person who refuses to pay, collect or remit any eco-fee duly required of the person under this chapter may be assessed by the department a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. The maximum penalty under this paragraph for any and all eco-fees required to be paid, collected or remitted in a single assessment period shall be $10,000.(e) Injunctive relief.--A violation of the prohibitions of this chapter may be enjoined in an action in the name of the Commonwealth brought by the Attorney General.(f) Limited private right action.--A person required to register with the department under this chapter that is duly registered and in good standing with the department and clearinghouse may maintain a civil action in Commonwealth Court against a noncompliant person to enjoin a violation of the prohibitions of this chapter.(g) Remittance of fees.--Eco-fees owed to the clearinghouse that are recovered by a third party shall be remitted to the clearinghouse.(h) Written notice of action, fees and costs.--(1) An action may not be commenced under this section until 60 days after a potential plaintiff provides to the potential noncompliant person a written notice of the claim specifying the amount of the claim and the basis for the calculation of that amount.(2) The potential plaintiff shall also deliver a copy of the notice to the clearinghouse and the department.(3) A court may, in the interests of justice, award to a registered person who prevails in an action brought under this section reasonable attorney fees and court costs, 20250SB0856PN0957 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including expert witness fees.(4) A class action may not be brought against a retailer on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of an eco-fee.§ 6723. Antitrust.(a) Authorization.--A CED manufacturer or stewardship organization acting in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may negotiate with, enter into contracts with or conduct business with each other and with any other entity developing, implementing, operating, participating in or performing any other activities directly related to a manufacturer product stewardship plan approved under this chapter.(b) Damages, liability and scrutiny.--The manufacturer, clearinghouse and any entity developing, implementing, operating, participating in or performing any other activities related to a stewardship plan approved under this chapter shall not be subject to damages, liability or scrutiny under Federal antitrust law or the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, regardless of the effects on competition.(c) Effect.--The supervisory activities described in this chapter are sufficient to confirm that activities of the manufacturers, stewardship organization and any entity developing, implementing, operating, participating in or performing any other activities related to a stewardship plan that is approved under this chapter are authorized and actively supervised by the Commonwealth.§ 6724. Other CED collection activities.(a) Waste hauler.--Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a waste hauler from entering into a contractual agreement with a 20250SB0856PN0957 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unit of local government to establish a collection program for the recycling or reuse of CEDs, including services such as curbside collection, home pick-up, drop-off locations or similar methods of collection.(b) E-waste program.--No person may be prohibited from establishing an e-waste program independently of a manufacturer e-waste program under this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0856PN0957 - 49 - 12345678